Illinois, session 104th, SB1941.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-605.3 and by adding Section 11-1412.4 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/11-605.3)8    Sec. 11-605.3. Special traffic protections while passing 9parks and recreation facilities and areas.10    (a) As used in this Section: 11        (1) "Park district" means the following entities: 12            (A) any park district organized under the Park 13        District Code; 14            (B) any park district organized under the Chicago 15        Park District Act; and 16            (C) any municipality, county, forest district, 17        school district, township, or other unit of local 18        government that operates a public recreation 19        department or public recreation facilities that has 20        recreation facilities that are not on land owned by 21        any park district listed in subparagraphs (A) and (B) 22        of this subdivision (a)(1). 23        (2) "Park zone" means the recreation facilities and   SB1941 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12045 LNS 22140 b1    areas on any land owned or operated by a park district that 2    are used for recreational purposes, including but not 3    limited to: parks; playgrounds; swimming pools; hiking 4    trails; bicycle paths; picnic areas; roads and streets; 5    and parking lots. 6        (3) "Park zone street" means that portion of any State 7    or local street or intersection under the control of a 8    local unit of government, adjacent to a park zone, where 9    the local unit of government has, by ordinance or 10    resolution, designated and approved the street or 11    intersection as a park zone street. If, before the 12    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 13    Assembly, a street already had a posted speed limit lower 14    than 20 miles per hour, then the lower limit may be used 15    for that park zone street. 16        (4) "Safety purposes" means the costs associated with: 17    park zone safety education; the purchase, installation, 18    and maintenance of signs, roadway painting, and caution 19    lights mounted on park zone signs; and any other expense 20    associated with park zones and park zone streets. 21    (b) On any day when children are present and within 50 feet 22of motorized traffic, a person may not drive a motor vehicle at 23a speed in excess of 20 miles per hour or any lower posted 24speed while traveling on a park zone street that has been 25designated for the posted reduced speed. 26    (c) On any day when children are present and within 50 feet   SB1941 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12045 LNS 22140 b1of motorized traffic, any driver traveling on a park zone 2street who fails to come to a complete stop at a stop sign or 3red light, including a driver who fails to come to a complete 4stop at a red light before turning right onto a park zone 5street, is in violation of this Section. 6    (d) This Section does not apply unless appropriate signs 7are posted upon park zone streets maintained by the Department 8or by the unit of local government in which the park zone is 9located. With regard to the special speed limit on park zone 10streets, the signs must give proper due warning that a park 11zone is being approached and must indicate the maximum speed 12limit on the park zone street. 13    (e) A first violation of this Section is a petty offense 14with a minimum fine of $250. A second or subsequent violation 15of this Section is a petty offense with a minimum fine of $500. 16    (f) (Blank). 17    (g) The Department shall, within 6 months of the effective 18date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly, 19design a set of standardized traffic signs for park zones and 20park zone streets, including but not limited to: "park zone", 21"park zone speed limit", and "warning: approaching a park 22zone". The design of these signs shall be made available to all 23units of local government or manufacturers at no charge, 24except for reproduction and postage.25(Source: P.A. 102-978, eff. 1-1-23.)   SB1941 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12045 LNS 22140 b1    (625 ILCS 5/11-1412.4 new)2    Sec. 11-1412.4. Flashing beacons required for school 3crosswalks. A unit of local government that has ownership or 4control over an intersection that is adjacent to property that 5is used for an elementary or secondary school may install at 6the ends of the pedestrian crosswalks for that intersection 7rapid flashing beacons that alert motor vehicle drivers to the 8presence of pedestrians in the crosswalk when the pedestrians 9who are using the crosswalk activate the beacons.